Utah statutes.
20A-9-202.5.   Declaration of candidacy -- Western States Presidential Primary.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Presidential candidate" means a person seeking nomination for President of the United States from a Utah registered political party.

(b)  "Utah registered political party" means a political party that has complied with the requirements of Title 20A, Chapter 8, Political Party Formation and Procedures, to become a political party officially recognized by the state.

(2)  Each presidential candidate, or the candidate's designated agent, shall file a declaration of candidacy with the lieutenant governor as provided in:

(a)  Section 20A-9-803, for participation in the Western States Presidential Primary election; or

(b)  Section 20A-9-201, for participation in the regular primary election.



Amended by Chapter 2, 2011 Special Session 3

